Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-571
Abandoned real estate; sale; sealed bids; deed.

Any sale under section 17-569 shall be by sealed bids; and upon approval of the sale by a two-thirds vote of the city council or village board of trustees, the mayor or chairperson of the village board of trustees shall, in the name of the city or village, execute and deliver a deed to the purchaser, which deed shall be attested by the city clerk or village clerk bearing the seal of the city or village.

Laws 1911, c. 17, § 4, p. 134;

R.S.1913, § 5180;

C.S.1922, § 4367;

C.S.1929, § 17-565;

R.S.1943, § 17-571;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 197.